Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2908
General supervision, defined.

General supervision means supervision either onsite or by means of telecommunication.

Laws 2006, LB 994, § 126;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-1,370;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1001.